Utah statutes.
25-6-8.   Remedies of creditors.

(1)  In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a creditor, subject to the limitations in Section 25-6-9, may obtain:

(a)  avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor's claim;

(b)  an attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure;

(c)  subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

(i)  an injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

(ii)  appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

(iii)  any other relief the circumstances may require.

(2)  If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.



Enacted by Chapter 59, 1988 General Session

